Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-517
Projects for political subdivisions; department; powers; applicability of act.

The department may enter into agreements under the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act to let, design, and construct projects for political subdivisions when any of the funding for such projects is provided by or through the department. In such instances, the department may enter into contracts with the design-builder, progressive design-builder, or construction manager. The Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act shall not apply to projects let, designed, and constructed under the supervision of the department pursuant to agreements with political subdivisions under the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 17.

Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act, see section 13-2901.